Utah statutes.
62A-4a-202.4.   Access to criminal background information.

(1)  For purposes of background screening and investigation of abuse or neglect under this chapter and Title 78A, Chapter 6, Part 3, Abuse, Neglect, and Dependency Proceedings, the division shall have direct access to criminal background information maintained pursuant to Title 53, Chapter 10, Part 2, Bureau of Criminal Identification.

(2)  The division and the Office of Guardian Ad Litem are authorized to request the Department of Public Safety to conduct a complete Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal background check through the national criminal history system (NCIC).



Amended by Chapter 32, 2009 General Session

